Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-536
Merged district; statutes applicable.

Each rural or suburban fire protection district merged pursuant to sections 35-530 to 35-536 shall be subject to the provisions of sections 35-508, 35-509, 35-511, and 35-512. Such merged district shall operate under the same tax levy limit as a rural or suburban fire protection district.

Laws 1978, LB 907, § 7;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 259;

Laws 1998, LB 1120, § 25.